District of Columbia statutes.
42-3607

Mayor’s authority and responsibility.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish within the Metropolitan Police Department a division to provide assistance to, supervision of, or protection to a plaintiff who has obtained an eviction order or other relief pursuant to this subchapter.

(b)

The Mayor shall report to the Council on an annual basis on the effectiveness of this subchapter.

Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 1308, 47 DCR 6308
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1308 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-376, July 24, 2000, 47 DCR 6574).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1308 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 13-172, the Residential Drug-Related Evictions Re-enactment Act of 2000, see Mayor’s Order 2006-206, December 30, 2005 53 DCR 2701).